California statutes. Insurance Code
 and any assistant to the Insurance Commissioner designated and authorized by the commissioner while acting under their designation as the Insurance Commissioner.

(d) The term “control” includes the terms “controlling,” “controlled by,” and “under common control with,” and means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract other than a commercial contract for goods or nonmanagement services, or otherwise, unless the power is the result of an official position with or corporate office held by the person. Control shall be presumed to exist if any person, directly or indirectly, owns, controls, holds with the power to vote, or holds proxies representing, more than 10 percent of the voting securities of
 any other person. This presumption may be rebutted by a showing that control does not exist in fact pursuant to the filing of a disclaimer of affiliation in accordance with subdivision (l) of Section 1215.4. The commissioner may, after furnishing all persons in interest notice and opportunity to be heard, determine that control exists in fact, notwithstanding the absence of a presumption to that effect.

(e) “Enterprise risk” means any activity, circumstance, or event or series of events involving one or more affiliates of an insurer that, if not remedied promptly, is likely to have a material adverse effect upon the financial condition or liquidity of the insurer or its insurance holding company system as a whole, including, but not limited to, anything that would cause the insurer’s risk-based capital to fall into company action
 level as set forth in Article 4.1 (commencing with Section 739) of Chapter 1 and under Section 739.5 or would cause the insurer to be in hazardous financial condition and allow the commissioner to take actions that are necessary under Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010), Article 14.3 (commencing with Section 1064.1), and Article 15.5 (commencing with Section 1077).

(f) “Group capital calculation instructions” means the group capital calculation instructions as adopted by the NAIC and as amended by the NAIC in accordance with the procedures adopted by the NAIC.

(g) “Groupwide supervisor” means the insurance official authorized to engage in conducting and coordinating groupwide supervision activities who is determined or acknowledged by the commissioner pursuant to
 subdivision (a) of Section 1215.75 to have sufficient significant contacts with the internationally active insurance group.

(h) An “insurance holding company system” consists of two or more affiliated persons, one or more of which is an insurer.

(i) “Insurer” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Section 826, excluding subdivisions (e) and (f) of that section.

(j) “Internationally active insurance group” means an insurance holding company system that includes an insurer registered pursuant to Section 1215.4 and that meets the following criteria:

(1) Insurers that are part of the insurance holding company system write premiums in at least three countries.

(2) The percentage of gross premiums written outside the United States is at least 10 percent of the insurance holding company system’s total gross written premiums.

(3) Based on a three-year rolling average, the total assets of the insurance holding company system are at least fifty billion dollars ($50,000,000,000) or the total gross written premiums of the insurance holding company system are at least ten billion dollars ($10,000,000,000).

(k) “NAIC” means the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

(l) The “NAIC Liquidity Stress Test Framework” is an NAIC publication that includes a history of the NAIC’s development of regulatory liquidity
 stress testing, the scope criteria applicable for a specific data year, and the liquidity stress test instructions and reporting templates for a specific data year. The scope criteria, instructions, and reporting template may be adopted by the NAIC and amended by the NAIC in accordance with the procedures adopted by the NAIC.

(m) “Person” is an individual, a corporation, a limited liability company, a partnership, an association, a joint stock company, a business trust, an unincorporated organization, or any similar entity, or any combination thereof acting in concert.

(n) “Scope criteria,” as detailed in the NAIC Liquidity Stress Test Framework, are the designated exposure bases along with minimum magnitudes thereof for the specified data year, which are used to establish a
 preliminary list of insurers considered scoped into the NAIC Liquidity Stress Test Framework for that data year.

(o) A “security holder” of a specified person is the holder that owns any security of that person, including common stock, preferred stock, debt obligations, and any other security convertible into or evidencing the right to acquire any of the foregoing.

(p) A “subsidiary” of a specified person is an affiliate controlled by that person directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries.

(q) “Voting security” shall include any security convertible into or evidencing a right to acquire a voting security.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 464, Sec. 1.   (AB 494)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.1.

(a) Any domestic insurer, either by itself or in cooperation with one or more persons, may organize or acquire one or more subsidiaries subject to the limitations of this section.

(b) In addition to investments in common stock, preferred stock, debt obligations, and other securities permitted under all other sections of this chapter, a domestic insurer may also do one or more of the following:

(1) Invest in common stock, preferred stock, debt obligations, and other securities of one or more subsidiaries, amounts that do not exceed the lesser of 10 percent of the insurer’s assets or 50 percent of the insurer’s surplus
 as regards policyholders. However, after these investments, the insurer’s surplus as regards policyholders shall be reasonable in relation to the insurer’s outstanding liabilities and adequate to its financial needs. In calculating the amount of these investments, there shall be excluded investments in insurance subsidiaries, and there shall be included (A) total net moneys or other consideration expended and obligations assumed in the acquisition or formation of a subsidiary, including all organizational expenses and contributions to capital and surplus of the subsidiary whether or not represented by the purchase of capital stock or issuance of other securities, and (B) all amounts expended in acquiring additional common stock, preferred stock, debt obligations, and other securities and all contributions to the capital or surplus of a subsidiary subsequent to its acquisition or formation.

“Insurance subsidiary” is an insurer that is organized within the United
 States and is controlled, directly or indirectly, by a reporting insurer subject to this article. For purposes of this paragraph, “investments in insurance subsidiaries” shall include the following:

(A) Any direct investment in an insurance subsidiary.

(B) The insurer’s proportionate share of any investment in an insurance subsidiary held by any subsidiary of the insurer. This shall be calculated by multiplying the amount of the subsidiary’s investment in the insurance subsidiary by the insurer’s percentage of ownership of the subsidiary.

(2) Invest any amount in common stock, preferred stock, debt obligations, and other securities of one or more subsidiaries, provided that each subsidiary agrees to limit its investments in any asset so that these investments will not cause the amount of the total investment of the
 insurer to exceed any of the investment limitations specified in paragraph (1) or in this chapter applicable to the insurer. For the purpose of this paragraph, “the total investment of the insurer” shall include (A) any direct investment by the insurer in an asset, and (B) the insurer’s proportionate share of any investment of an asset by any subsidiary of the insurer, which shall be calculated by multiplying the amount of the subsidiary’s investment by the percentage of the insurer’s ownership of that subsidiary.

(3) With the approval of the commissioner, invest any amount in common stock, preferred stock, debt obligations, or other securities of one or more subsidiaries, provided that after this investment the insurer’s surplus as regards policyholders shall be reasonable in relation to the insurer’s outstanding liabilities and adequate to its financial needs.

(c) Investments in
 common stock, preferred stock, debt obligations, or other securities of subsidiaries made pursuant to subdivision (b) shall neither limit nor be subject to any of the otherwise applicable authorizations, restrictions, or prohibitions contained in this article applicable to these investments of insurers.

(d) Whether any investment pursuant to subdivision (b) meets the applicable requirements thereof is to be determined immediately after the investment is made, taking into account the then outstanding principal balance on all previous investments in debt obligations, and the value of all previous investments in equity securities as of the date they were made.

(e) If an insurer ceases to control a subsidiary, it shall dispose of any investment therein made pursuant to this section within three years from the time of the cessation of control, or within any further time as the
 commissioner may prescribe, unless at any time after the investment has been made, the investment has met the requirements for investment under any other section of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 213, Sec. 3.   (AB 553)   Effective August 17, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.2.

(a) A person shall not make a tender offer for, or a request or invitation for tenders of, or enter into an agreement to exchange securities for or acquire in the open market, any voting security, or any security convertible into a voting security, of a domestic insurer or of any other person controlling a domestic insurer, if the other person is not substantially engaged either directly or through its affiliates in any businesses other than that of insurance, if, as a result of the consummation thereof, the person would, directly or indirectly, acquire control of the insurer, and a person shall not enter into an agreement to merge with or otherwise to acquire control of a domestic insurer, unless, at the time copies of the offer, purchase, request, or invitation are first published, sent, or given to security holders or the
 agreement or transaction is entered into, as the case may be, the person has filed with the commissioner, and has sent to the insurer, a statement containing the following information, and any additional information as the commissioner may by rule or regulation prescribe as necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of policyholders or shareholders:

(1) The background and identity of all persons by whom or on whose behalf the purchases or the exchange, merger, or other acquisition of control are to be effected.

(2) The source and amount of the funds or other consideration used or to be used in making the purchases or in effecting the exchange, merger, or other acquisition of control, and, if any part of the funds or other consideration has been or is to be borrowed or otherwise obtained for the purpose of making the purchases or effecting the exchange,
 merger, or other acquisition of control, a description of the transaction and the names of the parties thereto. However, where a source of funds is a loan made in the lender’s ordinary course of business, if the person filing the statement so requests, the name of the lender shall not be made available to the public.

(3) Any plans or proposals that those persons may have to liquidate the insurer, to sell its assets or merge it with any person, or to make any other major change in its business or corporate structure or management.

(4) The amount of each class of voting securities or securities that may be converted into voting securities of the insurer or the controlling person that are beneficially owned, and the amount of each class of voting securities or securities that may be converted into voting securities of the insurer or the controlling person concerning which there is a
 right to acquire beneficial ownership, by each person and by each affiliate of each person, together with the name and address of each affiliate.

(5) Information as to any contracts, arrangements, or understandings with any person with respect to any securities of the insurer or the controlling person, including, but not limited to, transfer of any of the securities, joint ventures, loan or option arrangements, puts or calls, guarantees of loans, guarantees against loss or guarantees of profits, division of losses or profits, or the giving or withholding of proxies, naming the persons with whom the contracts, arrangements, or understandings have been entered into, and giving the details thereof.

All requests or invitations for tenders or advertisements making a tender offer or requesting or inviting tenders of the voting securities of the insurer or the controlling person made by or on behalf of the
 person, and a copy of the agreement to exchange or otherwise acquire securities or to merge with or otherwise to acquire control of the insurer, shall be filed with the commissioner and sent to the insurer as a part of the statement and shall contain the information contained in the statement as the commissioner may by rule or regulation prescribe. Copies of any additional material soliciting or requesting the tender offers subsequent to the initial solicitation or request, and copies of any amendment to the agreement, shall contain the information as the commissioner may by rule or regulation prescribe as necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of policyholders or shareholders, and shall be filed with the commissioner and sent to the insurer not later than the time copies of the material are first published or sent or given to security holders or the amendment is entered into.

(b) If the person required to file
 the statement referred to in subdivision (a) is a partnership, limited partnership, syndicate, or other group, the commissioner may require that the information called for by paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) shall be given with respect to: (1) each partner of the partnership or limited partnership, (2) each member of the syndicate or group, and (3) each person who controls the partner or member. If a person referred to in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of this subdivision is a corporation or the person required to file the statement referred to in subdivision (a) is a corporation, the commissioner may require that the information called for by paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) shall be given with respect to the corporation and each officer and director of the corporation and each person who is directly or indirectly the beneficial owner of more than 10 percent of the outstanding voting securities of the
 corporation.

(c) If any tender offer, request, or invitation for tenders, or agreement to exchange or otherwise acquire securities or to merge or otherwise acquire control referred to in subdivision (a), is proposed to be made by means of a registration statement under the federal Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 77a et seq.), or in circumstances requiring the disclosure of similar information under the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 78a et seq.), or under a state law requiring similar registration or disclosure, the person required to file the statement referred to in subdivision (a) may file that registration statement with the commissioner as full satisfaction of the requirement in subdivision (a).

(d) The purchases, exchanges, mergers, or other acquisitions of control referred to in subdivision (a) may not be made until the commissioner approves
 the purchases, exchanges, mergers, or other acquisitions of control. The commissioner shall approve or disapprove the transaction on or before the latter of 60 days after the statement required by subdivision (a) has been filed with the commissioner or, if a hearing is held pursuant to subdivision (f), 30 days after the close of the hearing held pursuant to subdivision (f). The commissioner may disapprove the transaction if the commissioner finds any of the following:

(1) After the change of control the domestic insurer referred to in subdivision (a) could not satisfy the requirements for the issuance of a license to write the line or lines of insurance for which it is presently licensed.

(2) The purchases, exchanges, mergers, or other acquisitions of control would substantially lessen competition in insurance in this state or create a monopoly therein.

(3) The financial condition of an acquiring person might jeopardize the financial stability of the insurer, or prejudice the interests of its policyholders.

(4) The plans or proposals that the acquiring person has to liquidate the insurer, to sell its assets, or to merge it with any person, or to make any other major change in its business or corporate structure or management, are not fair and reasonable to policyholders.

(5) The competence, experience, and integrity of those persons who would control the operation of the insurer indicate that it would not be in the interest of policyholders or the public to permit them to do so.

(e) The commissioner shall require the payment of five thousand six hundred forty-two dollars ($5,642) as a fee for filing an
 application pursuant to this section, the amount to accompany the application. The application shall be on a form and in a format prescribed by the NAIC.

(f) (1) The commissioner may hold a public hearing after the statement required by subdivision (a) is filed. If a hearing is held, at least 20 days’ notice shall be given by the commissioner to the person filing the statement. Not less than seven days’ notice of the public hearing shall be given by the person filing the statement to the insurer and to other persons as may be designated by the commissioner. At the hearing, the person filing the statement, the insurer, any person to whom notice of hearing was sent, and any other person whose interest may be affected, shall have the right to present evidence, examine and cross-examine witnesses, and offer oral and written arguments, and in connection therewith shall be entitled to conduct proceedings in the same manner as is
 presently allowed under the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). All discovery proceedings shall be concluded not later than three days prior to the commencement of the public hearing.

(2) If the proposed acquisition of control will require the approval of more than one commissioner, the public hearing referred to in paragraph (1) may be held on a consolidated basis upon request of the person filing the statement referred to in subdivision (a). The person shall file the statement referred to in subdivision (a) with the NAIC within five days of making the request for a public hearing. A commissioner may opt out of a consolidated hearing, and shall provide notice to the applicant of the opt-out within 10 days of the receipt of the statement referred to in subdivision (a). A hearing conducted on a consolidated basis shall be public and shall be held
 within the United States before the commissioners of the states in which the insurers are domiciled. The commissioners shall hear and receive evidence. Any commissioner may attend the hearing, in person or by telecommunication.

(g) This section shall not apply to any offer for or request or invitation for tenders of any voting securities, or any agreement to exchange securities for or otherwise acquire control, if the insurer whose shares are to be acquired remains a direct or indirect subsidiary of the same ultimate controlling company person within the insurer’s insurance holding company system, neither the acquiring person nor any affiliate acquires or incurs any debt, guarantee, or other liability related to the transaction, and no shares are purchased by or sold to a person who is not an affiliated person in that insurance holding company system, or if, and to the extent that, the commissioner, by rule or regulation or by order, exempts
 the offer, request, invitation, or agreement from the provisions of this section as not comprehended within the purposes thereof.

(h) For purposes of this section, any controlling person of a domestic insurer seeking to divest its controlling interest in the domestic insurer, in any manner, shall file with the commissioner, with a copy to the insurer, confidential notice of its proposed divestiture at least 30 days prior to the cessation of control. The commissioner shall determine those instances in which the party or parties seeking to divest a controlling interest in an insurer shall be required to file for and obtain approval of the transaction. The information shall remain confidential until the conclusion of the transaction unless the commissioner, in his or her discretion, determines that confidential treatment will interfere with enforcement of this article. If the statement referred to in subdivision (a) is otherwise filed, this
 subdivision shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 28.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.3.

The following shall be violations of this article:

(a) The failure to file the statement required under subdivision (a) of Section 1215.2.

(b) Effectuation or any attempt to effectuate an acquisition or control of, or merger with, a domestic insurer either within the 60-day period referred to in subdivision (d) of Section 1215.2, unless the commissioner has given his approval thereto, or after disapproval of such acquisition of control or merger.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.4.

(a) Every insurer that is authorized to do business in this state and that is a member of an insurance holding company system shall register with the commissioner, except a foreign insurer subject to disclosure requirements and standards adopted by statute or regulation in the jurisdiction of its domicile if substantially similar to those contained in this section. The exemption from registration for those foreign insurers shall not apply to any commercially domiciled insurer within this state, as provided in Section 1215.14. Any insurer that is subject to registration under this section shall register within 60 days after the effective date of this article or 15 days after it becomes subject to registration, whichever is later, and annually
 thereafter by April 30 of each year for the previous calendar year, unless the
 commissioner for good cause shown extends the time for registration. The commissioner may require a holding company system that is not subject to registration under this section to furnish a copy of the registration statement or other information filed by the insurance company with the insurance regulatory authority of domiciliary jurisdiction.

(b) Every insurer subject to registration shall file a registration statement with the commissioner on a form and in a format prescribed by the NAIC, which shall contain current information about the following:

(1) The capital structure, general financial condition, ownership, and management of the insurer and any person controlling the insurer.

(2) The identity and relationship of every member of the insurance holding company system.

(3) The following agreements in force, relationships subsisting, and transactions currently outstanding or that have occurred during the last calendar year between the insurer and its affiliates:

(A) Loans, extensions of credit, investments, or purchases, sales, or exchanges of securities of the affiliates by the insurer or of the insurer by its affiliates.

(B) Purchases, sales, or exchanges of assets.

(C) Transactions not in the ordinary course of business.

(D) Guarantees or undertakings for the benefit of an
 affiliate that result in an actual contingent exposure of the insurer’s assets to liability, other than insurance contracts entered into in the ordinary course of the insurer’s business.

(E) All management agreements, service contracts, and cost-sharing arrangements. However, subscription agreements or powers of attorney executed by subscribers of a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange are not required to be reported pursuant to this section if the form of the agreement was in use before 1943 and was not amended in any way to modify payments, fees, or waivers of fees or otherwise substantially amended after 1943.

(F) Reinsurance agreements.

(G) Dividends and other distributions to shareholders.

(H) Consolidated tax allocation agreements.

(4) A pledge of the insurer’s stock, including stock of a subsidiary or controlling affiliate, for a loan made to a member of
 the insurance holding company system.

(5) If requested by the commissioner, the insurer shall include financial statements of or within an insurance holding company system, including all affiliates. Financial statements may include, but are not limited to, annual audited financial statements filed with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) pursuant to the federal Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. An insurer required to file financial statements pursuant to this paragraph may satisfy the request by providing the commissioner with the most recently filed parent corporation financial statements that have been filed with the SEC.

(6) Statements that the insurer’s board of directors is
 responsible for overseeing corporate governance and internal controls and that the insurer’s officers or senior management have approved, implemented, and continue to maintain and monitor corporate governance and internal control procedures.

(7) Other matters as may be included in registration forms adopted by the NAIC, to the extent otherwise required by the commissioner.

(c) All registration statements shall contain a summary outlining all items in the current registration statement that are changes from the prior registration statement.

(d) Information does not need to be disclosed on the registration statement filed pursuant to subdivision (b) if the information is not material for the purposes of this section.
 Unless the commissioner provides otherwise, sales, purchases, exchanges, loans or extensions of credit, investments, or guarantees involving one-half of 1 percent or less of an insurer’s admitted assets as of the preceding December 31, are not deemed material for purposes of this section. The description of material in this subdivision does not apply for purposes of the group capital calculation or the NAIC Liquidity Stress Test Framework.

(e) Each registered insurer shall keep current the information required to be disclosed in its registration statement by reporting all material changes or additions within 15 days after the end of the month in which it learns of each change or addition.

(f) Subject to subdivision (g) of Section 1215.5, each registered insurer shall report all
 dividends and other distributions to shareholders within five business days following declaration. A dividend or other distribution to shareholders shall not be paid until at least 10 business days after receipt by the commissioner, at the office of the department prescribed by the commissioner by notice to all insurers, of a notice of the declaration of the dividend or other distribution.

(g) Every person in an insurance holding company system subject to registration is required to provide the insurer with all information reasonably necessary to enable the insurer to comply with the provisions of this article.

(h) The commissioner shall terminate the registration of any insurer that demonstrates that it no longer is a member of an insurance holding company system.

(i) The commissioner may require or allow two or more affiliated insurers subject to registration hereunder to file a consolidated registration statement or consolidated reports amending their consolidated registration statement or their individual registration statements.

(j) The commissioner may allow any insurer that is authorized to do business in this state that is part of an insurance holding company system to register on behalf of any affiliated insurer that is required to register under subdivision (a), and to file all information and material required to be filed under this article.

(k) The provisions of this section do not apply to any insurer, information, or transaction exempted by the commissioner.

(l) Any person may file with the commissioner a disclaimer of affiliation with any authorized insurer. A disclaimer of affiliation may be filed by an insurer or any member of an insurance holding company system. The disclaimer shall fully disclose all material relationships and bases for affiliation between the person and the insurer, as well as the basis for disclaiming an affiliation. After a disclaimer has been filed, the insurer is relieved of any duty to register or report under this section that may arise out of the insurer’s relationship with the disclaimed person unless and until the commissioner disallows the disclaimer. The commissioner shall disallow the disclaimer only after furnishing all parties in interest with notice and opportunity to be heard and after making specific findings of fact to support the disallowance. If the commissioner
 at any time determines that the information disclosed in the disclaimer is incomplete or inaccurate, the commissioner may disallow the disclaimer.

(m) The ultimate controlling person of an insurer subject to registration shall also file an annual enterprise risk report. The report shall, to the best of the ultimate controlling person’s knowledge and belief, identify the material risks within the insurance holding company system that could pose enterprise risk to the insurer. The report shall be filed with the lead state commissioner, when applicable, of the insurance holding company system as determined by the procedures within the Financial Analysis Handbook adopted by the NAIC, and if the commissioner is not the lead state commissioner of the insurance holding company system, a copy shall be provided to the commissioner if the
 insurance holding company system has an insurer domiciled in this state. The first annual enterprise risk report shall be filed with the insurer’s registration statement after July 1, 2013, unless the commissioner establishes a later date either by bulletin or notice.

(n) The ultimate controlling person of an insurer subject to registration shall concurrently file with the registration an annual group capital calculation as directed by the lead state commissioner, except as provided in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive. The report shall be completed in accordance with the NAIC Group Capital Calculation Instructions, which may authorize the lead state commissioner to allow a controlling person that is not the ultimate controlling person to file the group capital calculation. The report shall be filed with the lead state commissioner of the insurance holding
 company system as determined by the commissioner in accordance with the procedures within the Financial Analysis Handbook adopted by the NAIC. All of the following insurance holding company systems are exempt from filing the group capital calculation:

(1) An insurance holding company system that has only one insurer within its holding company structure, that only writes business and is only licensed in its domestic state, and that does not assume business from any other insurer.

(2) An insurance holding company system that is required to perform a group capital calculation specified by the Federal Reserve Board. The lead state commissioner shall request the calculation from the Federal Reserve Board under the terms of information sharing agreements in effect. If the Federal
 Reserve Board cannot share the calculation with the lead state commissioner, the insurance holding company system is not exempt from the group capital calculation filing.

(3) An insurance holding company system whose non-United States groupwide supervisor is located within a reciprocal jurisdiction, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 922.425, that recognizes the United States’ state regulatory approach to group supervision and group capital.

(4) An insurance holding company system that meets both of the following criteria:

(A) The insurance holding company system provides information to the lead state commissioner that meets the requirements for accreditation under the NAIC financial standards and
 accreditation program, either directly or indirectly through the groupwide supervisor, who has determined the information is satisfactory to allow the lead state to comply with the NAIC group supervision approach, as detailed in the Financial Analysis Handbook adopted by the NAIC.

(B) The insurance holding company system’s groupwide supervisor that is not located within a reciprocal jurisdiction, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 922.425, recognizes and accepts the group capital calculation as the worldwide group capital assessment for United States insurance groups who operate in that jurisdiction.

(i) A non-United States jurisdiction is considered to “recognize and accept” the group capital calculation if it satisfies the criteria in both subclauses (I) and (II):

(I) Either of the following is met to satisfy this subclause:

(ia) The non-United States jurisdiction recognizes the United States’ state regulatory approach to group supervision and group capital by providing confirmation by a competent regulatory authority in that jurisdiction that insurers and insurance groups whose lead state is accredited by the NAIC under the NAIC Accreditation Program are subject only to worldwide prudential insurance group supervision, including worldwide group governance, solvency and capital, and reporting, as applicable, by the lead state and will not be subject to group supervision, including worldwide group governance, solvency and capital, and reporting, at the level of the worldwide parent undertaking of the insurance or reinsurance group by the
 non-United States jurisdiction.

(ib) If a United States insurance group does not operate in the non-United States jurisdiction, that non-United States jurisdiction indicates formally in writing to the lead state commissioner with a copy to the International Association of Insurance Supervisors that the group capital calculation is an acceptable international capital standard.

(II) The non-United States jurisdiction provides confirmation by a competent regulatory authority in that jurisdiction that information regarding insurers and their parent, subsidiary, or affiliated entities, if applicable, shall be provided to the lead state commissioner in accordance with a memorandum of understanding or similar document between the commissioner and the jurisdiction,
 including the International Association of Insurance Supervisors Multilateral Memorandum of Understanding or other multilateral memoranda of understanding coordinated by the NAIC. The commissioner shall determine, in consultation with the NAIC committee process, if the requirements of the information sharing agreements are in force.

(ii) A list of non-United States jurisdictions that recognize and accept the group capital calculation shall be published through the NAIC committee process.

(I) A list of jurisdictions that recognize and accept the group capital calculation published through the NAIC committee process shall assist the lead state commissioner in determining which insurers shall file an annual group capital calculation. The list shall clarify those
 situations in which a jurisdiction is exempted from filing pursuant to this paragraph. To assist with a determination pursuant to subdivision (o), the list shall also identify whether a jurisdiction that is exempted under paragraph (3) or this paragraph requires a group capital filing for a United States-based insurance group’s operations in that non-United States jurisdiction.

(II) For a non-United States jurisdiction where United States-based insurance groups do not operate, the confirmation provided to meet the requirement of subclause (I) of clause (i) shall serve as support for a recommendation to be published as a jurisdiction that recognizes and accepts the group capital calculation through the NAIC committee process.

(III) If the lead state commissioner makes a determination pursuant
 to this paragraph that differs from the NAIC list, the lead state commissioner shall provide thoroughly documented justification to the NAIC and other states.

(IV) Upon a determination by the lead state commissioner that a non-United States jurisdiction no longer meets one or more of the requirements to recognize and accept the group capital calculation, the lead state commissioner may provide a recommendation to the NAIC that the non-United States jurisdiction be removed from the list of jurisdictions that recognize and accept the group capital calculation.

(o) (1) Notwithstanding paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (n), a lead state commissioner shall require the group capital calculation for United States operations of any non-United States-based
 insurance holding company system if, after any necessary consultation with other supervisors or officials, it is deemed appropriate by the lead state commissioner for prudential oversight and solvency monitoring purposes or for ensuring the competitiveness of the insurance marketplace.

(2) Notwithstanding the group capital calculation exemptions in subdivision (n), the lead state commissioner may exempt the
 ultimate controlling person from filing the annual group capital calculation or accept a limited group capital filing or report pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B).

(A) If an insurance holding company system has previously filed the annual group capital calculation at least once, the lead state commissioner may exempt the ultimate controlling person from filing the annual group capital calculation if the lead state commissioner makes a determination based upon that filing that the insurance holding company system meets all of the following criteria:

(i) The insurance holding company system has annual direct written and unaffiliated assumed premium, including international direct and assumed premium, but excluding premiums reinsured with the Federal Crop
 Insurance Corporation and Federal Flood Program, of less than one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000).

(ii) The insurance holding company system does not have insurers within its holding company structure that are domiciled outside of the United States or one of its territories.

(iii) The insurance holding company system does not include within its structure a banking, depository, or other financial entity that is subject to an identified regulatory capital framework.

(iv) The insurance holding company system attests that there are no material changes in the transactions between insurers and noninsurers in the group that have occurred since the last filing of the annual group capital calculation.
